Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1220
Board; members; compensation; expenses; administration.

(1) Each member of the board shall, in addition to necessary traveling and lodging expenses, receive a per diem for each day actually engaged in the discharge of the duties of a member of the board, including compensation for the time spent in traveling to and from the place of conducting business. Traveling and lodging expenses shall be on the same basis as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177. The compensation per day shall not exceed fifty dollars and shall be determined by the board with the approval of the department.

(2) The board may select one or more of its members to attend the annual meeting of the national organization of state boards of water well contractors or other related meetings. Any member so selected shall receive traveling and lodging expenses in attending such meetings on the same basis as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

(3) The department shall be responsible for the general administration of the activities of the board. The cost of operation and administration of the board shall be paid from the General Fund and the Water Well Standards and Contractors' Licensing Fund.

Laws 2021, LB148, § 61.
July 1, 2021